Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Part 12

Department of Human Services

4-3-1201. Creation.

There is hereby created the department of human services.

Acts 1937, ch. 33, § 1; 1939, ch. 11, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 255.1; Acts 1975, ch. 219, § 1; modified.

Compiler's Notes. The department of human services, created by this section and §4-3-101, terminates June 30, 2022. See §§4-29-112,4-29-243.

For the transfer of certain children-related functions from the department of human services to the departments of health and children's services, Executive Order No. 6 (January 12, 1996).

Cross-References. Creation of the department of human services, §4-3-101.

Organization, powers and duties of department, title 71, ch. 1, part 1.

4-3-1202. Commissioner.

The department of human services shall be under the charge and general supervision of the commissioner of human services.

Acts 1937, ch. 33, § 2; 1939, ch. 11, § 2; C. Supp. 1950, § 255.2; Acts 1975, ch. 219, § 2; modified.

4-3-1203. General functions of department.

The department of human services shall administer all functions to be established in this state under the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. § 301 et seq.), except those functions that may be expressly delegated by either state statute or by federal law to other state departments, offices or agencies.

Acts 1937, ch. 33, § 59; 1939, ch. 11, § 37; C. Supp. 1950, § 255.58 (Williams, § 255.62); Acts 1975, ch. 219, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-312.

Compiler's Notes. For transfer of certain powers and duties to the office of children's services administration in the department of finance and administration, see Executive Order No. 58 (June 29, 1994).

4-3-1204. Duties of commissioner.

The commissioner shall formulate rules and regulations:

Fixing the minimum standards of service to be required of the local government authorities in carrying out the public welfare functions reposed in them;

Providing for the termination of any grants-in-aid to any such local government authority whenever it becomes apparent that such minimum standards are not being complied with; and

Requiring that the local governments shall bear such proportion of the total expenses as may be fixed by statute.

The terms of subdivision (a)(1) shall apply only to the social security program.

The commissioner is authorized to provide technical assistance to private employers pertaining to the implementation of day care services as an employee benefit under a cafeteria benefit plan. Such technical assistance shall be coordinated with appropriate state officials and private industry associations.

Acts 1937, ch. 33, §§ 59, 60; 1939, ch. 11, §§ 37, 38; C. Supp. 1950, §§ 255.58, 255.59 (Williams, §§ 255.62, 255.63); Acts 1975, ch. 219, §§ 3, 4; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 4-312, 4-313; Acts 1988, ch. 801, § 1; 1996, ch. 1079, § 19.

Cross-References. Commission on aging and disability, commissioner as member, §71-2-104.

Organization, powers and duties of department, title 71, ch. 1, part 1.

4-3-1205. Definitions for §§ 4-3-1205 – 4-3-1208.

As used in §§ 4-3-1205 – 4-3-1208, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Analytical procedure” means a process consisting of evaluations of financial information made by a study of plausible relationships among both financial and nonfinancial data, and involving a comparison of recorded values with expectations developed by an auditor. “Analytical procedure” includes, but is not limited to, data analysis to identify subrecipients who claim maximum reimbursement when fluctuations are expected, and the unreasonable or inconsistent relationships between the subrecipients' ability to provide the level of services that the subrecipients claim for reimbursement;

“Chairs” mean:

The chair of the government operations committee of the house of representatives and the chair of the government operations committee of the senate;

The chair of the health committee of the house of representatives and the chair of the health and welfare committee of the senate; and

The chair of the finance, ways and means committee of the house of representatives and the chair of the finance, ways and means committee of the senate;

“Department” means the department of human services;

“Speakers” mean the speaker of the house of representatives and the speaker of the senate;

“Sponsoring organization”:

Means a public or nonprofit private organization that is entirely responsible for the administration of a food program in:

One (1) or more day care homes;

A child care center, emergency shelter, at-risk afterschool care center, outside-school-hours care center, or adult day care center which is a legally distinct entity from the sponsoring organization;

Two (2) or more child care centers, emergency shelters, at-risk afterschool care centers, outside-school-hours care center, or adult day care centers; or

Any combination of child care centers, emergency shelters, at-risk afterschool care centers, outside-school-hours care centers, adult day care centers, and day care homes; and

Includes an organization that is entirely responsible for administration of a food program in any combination of two (2) or more child care centers, at-risk afterschool care centers, adult day care centers, or outside-school-hours care centers; and

“Subrecipient” means a nonfederal legal entity that receives a sub award from the department acting as a pass-through agency to carry out a federal program or grant. “Subrecipient” includes a sponsoring organization. “Subrecipient” does not include an individual that is a beneficiary of the program.

Every three (3) months, the department shall submit to the chairs, the speakers, and the comptroller of the treasury a report summarizing each announced and unannounced physical site visit conducted by the department during the subrecipient monitoring process. The report shall also contain advance notice of any announced and unannounced site visits planned for the following three-month period.

Every three (3) months, the office of inspector general within the department of human services shall submit to the chairs, the speakers, and the comptroller of the treasury a report summarizing the results of any substantiated investigation concerning fraud, waste, and abuse regarding the child and adult care food program and summer food service program.

The department's written reports submitted pursuant to subsections (b) and (c) shall be treated as confidential and shall not be open for public inspection.

The department shall develop subrecipient monitoring plans utilizing analytical procedures. The subrecipient monitoring plans shall be submitted to the chairs, speakers, and comptroller of the treasury prior to October 1 of each year, consistent with state central procurement office policy and the applicable federal plan development and submission cycle.

To the extent authorized by federal law, the department shall perform both announced and unannounced physical site visits during the subrecipient monitoring process. The department shall not provide any subrecipients with a description of the information sought by the department in anticipation of physical site visits conducted by the department during the subrecipient monitoring process.

Acts 2016, ch. 798, § 1; 2019, ch. 71, § 2.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, §10-7-504.

4-3-1206. Performance bond — Requirements — Exceptions.

To the extent authorized by federal law, the department shall require a sponsoring organization applying to participate in any food program administered through the department to obtain and maintain a performance bond from a company designated in the United States Treasury Circular 570 as certified to issue bonds for the child and adult care food program and the summer food service program in an amount specified by the department.

The bond amount shall be reviewed and adjusted to reflect actual enrollment or reimbursement as needed.

A sponsoring organization may request relief from the bonding requirement once it can demonstrate that it has accumulated three (3) consecutive years of successful administrative and financial history by submitting a written request to the department.

Acts 2016, ch. 798, § 2.

4-3-1207. Background checks.

During the application process, and at any time during a sponsoring organization's or subrecipient's participation in a food program administered by the department, to the extent authorized by federal law the department shall conduct background checks on each applicant of the subrecipient or sponsoring organization, to determine if any applicant has a criminal history that would make the organization ineligible to participate in a food program administered by the department. Criminal history that meets this criterion includes a criminal conviction in the seven (7) years preceding the date of application or the date of background check that indicates a lack of business integrity including, but not limited to, any crime involving dishonesty.

Acts 2016, ch. 798, § 3.

4-3-1208. Authority to obtain state and national history background checks on employees and contractors with access to individuals with disabilities.

The department is authorized, in accordance with 34 U.S.C. § 40102(a)(1), to obtain state and national criminal history background checks and investigations performed by the Tennessee bureau of investigation and the federal bureau of investigation on employees and contractors of the department of human services division of rehabilitation services who are likely to have access to individuals with disabilities.

An employee of the department of human services division of rehabilitation services who is likely to have access to individuals with disabilities must:

Agree to the release of all investigative records to the state for the purpose of verifying criminal history information; and

Supply a fingerprint sample and submit to a state criminal history background check and investigation to be conducted by the Tennessee bureau of investigation and a national criminal history background check and investigation to be conducted by the federal bureau of investigation.

A person who is contracted with the department of human services division of rehabilitation services or employed by or subcontracted with a company that is contracted with the department of human services division of rehabilitation services who is likely to have access to individuals with disabilities must:

Agree to the release of all investigative records to their employer or the state for the purpose of verifying criminal history information; and

Supply a fingerprint sample and submit to a state criminal history background check and investigation to be conducted by the Tennessee bureau of investigation and a national criminal history background check and investigation to be conducted by the federal bureau of investigation; or

Release information for a criminal background investigation by a state-licensed private investigation company.

The department may require a person or entity contracting with the department to pay the costs associated with the background investigations of all employees of the contractor, which may be a condition of the contract with the department. If the background check is conducted by the Tennessee bureau of investigation or the federal bureau of investigation, the payment of the costs shall be made in accordance with § 38-6-103.

The department is authorized to promulgate rules regarding the implementation and use of the background checks and investigations conducted pursuant to this section. All rules must be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in chapter 5 of this title.

Acts 2019, ch. 71, § 1.